Massachusetts, session 194th, S1378.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 149 of the General laws is hereby amended by adding after section 52E the
following section:-
Section 52F. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law or rule or regulation to the
contrary, an employee is entitled to take unpaid leave when necessary to appear in the Probate
and Family Court, on all matters pertaining to their rights and duties as a parent or legal
guardian, including but not limited to, divorce, paternity, actions arising out of chapter 209c for
custody-support-parenting time, and modifications or enforcement of all such actions.
(b) An employee may elect, or an employer may require the employee, to substitute any
of the accrued paid vacation leave, personal leave, or medical or sick leave of the employee for
of 2

any of the leave provided under this section, but nothing in this section shall require an employer
to provide paid sick leave or paid medical leave in any situation in which the employer would
not normally provide any such paid leave. Leave under this section may be taken intermittently
or on a reduced leave schedule.
(c) If the necessity for leave under this section is foreseeable, the employee shall provide
the employer with not less than seven days of notice before the date the leave is to begin. If the
necessity for leave is not foreseeable, the employee shall provide such notice as is practicable.
(d) An employer may require that a request for leave under this section be supported by a
certification issued at such time and in such manner as the attorney general may by regulation
require.
(e) The attorney general shall enforce this section, and may obtain injunctive or
declaratory relief for this purpose. Violation of this section shall be subject to the second
paragraph of section 150 and to section 180.
of 2